si_LK.dic
අඟුල්/2921
අනින/37,400,817,1436,1472,4155
අනුමාන/52,3247,4511,4655
අසාත්මිකතාවට/2412
අසිත/6,2971
ආශ්‍රය/1,2,8,85,91,1272,3751,3752
ඇසුර/1,2,4,5,8,18,21,24,36,91,118,148,221,243,317,1028,1251,1392,4270
ඉවසා/94,3659,3781
උකුල/6,2335,4108,4109
උත්තම/19,49,90,93,119,152,779,909,2306,2307,2946,4423
උදව්/10,29,34,39,45,58,61,144,191,235,371,391,471,517,1367,1368,1625,3432,3813
ඔත්පල/3,2698
කරගත/1047
කළමනාකර/33,1642,2904
කිහිපදෙනක්/7,1257
කුටි/3,14,15,19,26,29,40,74,405,638,3732
කුමර/9,16,20,24,41,52,70,123,153,187,215,247,257,280,318,319,580,622,725,769,828,878,1040,1608,2904,3615,3979,3983
කුවේට/3,6,15,263,444,2097,2581,3549,4531
කූඩු/10,26,31,38,39,45,58,94,98,344,548,3639,4213
කොක්/17,97,153,481,2789
ක්‍රීඩා/218,1113,1211,1406,1716,2606,2607,2846,2847,2849,3241,3424,3881,4632
ගිරය/896,1945
ගෝවා/1892
චිකිත්සක/119,2894
ජයගත/316,669,908,1000,1194
ජිවී/9,70,3607
ටියුනා/1262
තුමා/1,12,35,329,2095,2205
තොටුපළ/1,2,8,17,18,21,26,32,220,227,1239,1820,1821,2177,3573
දඬුවම/1,4,5,6,18,21,101,110,190,1831,4380
දිසා/57,442,490,506,729,1191,2040,2499,2520,2975,3251,3611,4666,4737
දෙබර/842,4115
දේවතාවා/1627
ධාරා/1623
නොකළ/1,2,5,11,20,123,132,182,291,691,908,949,2707,2708,2802,3921
නොදක්/37,54,96,175,901,1973,2252,3841
නොසිට/7,52,59,80,341,342,366,518,885,952,1042,1043,1404,1882,2540,2809,3353,3836,4780,4856
පතුරන/635
පවුල/1,2,4,5,6,7,8,13,17,21,25,28,30,47,77,97,101,110,131,156,295,2980
පාඩ්/1622
පැවසී/3,7,50,52,72,143,173,214,620,718,822,941,1628,2744,3620,3663
පැවැත/16,41,107,209,229,277,307,1265,1856,2209,2765,4425
පිදු/2704
පිරිනැමී/3,7,50,67,72,81,143,173,419,594,718,792,3663
පිස්සු/10,11,39,58,877
පිහිට/1,4,8,13,16,20,24,26,33,52,54,57,59,62,63,76,80,88,107,109,115,122,130,136,176,186,198,212,221,223,238,280,281,290,342,464,478,595,666,721,824,832,1034,1137,1265,1597,1621,1829,1847,1851,2203,2272,2735,2736,2737,2742,2743,3296,3658,3876,3916,4519
පිළිකා/108,1064,1599,3185,3675,3676,4517
පූසි/1,2725
පෙන්නන/43,53,249,282,879
ප්‍රමානය/1228,2376
ප්‍රවාහන/3,15,19,71,2446,2449,3182
බංගලා/10,11,98,127,451,1510,1887,2064,2537
බලකා/3,14,15,19,27,64,108,240,2799
බලපෑම/1,2,4,6,8,13,21,25,91,92,105,110,156,1098,1661,1963
බැසිල්/2262
බෙල්/287,1249
භාරදී/57,3646
මට්ටම/1,2,4,6,8,11,13,17,18,21,25,28,32,36,89,101,110,148,227,356,420,762,1661,2653
මළගම/1,2719
මාක්ස්වාදි/9,42,49,70,78,84,119,348,389,430,2041,4709
මාමුඩාවල/2706
මිනිසා/1,5,10,11,12,35,77,95,102,219,305,364,555,1029,1252,1607,2760,3637
මුණගැසී/50,67,72,81,143,173,419,594,683,1590
මුදල/1,2,4,5,6,7,8,9,11,16,17,18,21,25,28,36,87,91,92,101,110,156,248,784,813,957,1165,1172,1273,1419,1890,2127,2292,2313,2665,3051,3532,3762,3856,3860
මුදා/61,113,300,332,545,546,756,890,2539,2830,4088,4095
මෙත්/118,138,846,1249,3638,3651,3780
මෙනු/58,875
මෙවර/5,11,4394,4396
මොලය/1,2,896
මොහොමඩ්/2786
මෝසම/4,6,91,1288,1682
යැවී/1,3,143,173,376,553,594,620,718,941
රැඳවී/3,50,67,143,173,365,376,3718
රිදී/7,66,108,202,365,553,683,717,1023,1605,2493,2717
රියදුරු/1,12,35,164,577,1842
ලබාගත/4732
ලබාදී/57,173,436,553,593,594,620,682,1023,1031,2212,3620,3720
ලෝරා/1876,2721
වටවූ/362
වර්ග/3,13,14,15,19,23,26,27,29,31,40,44,48,49,55,56,71,97,147,152,185,197,266,324,337,638,662,1261,1300,1322,1534,1719,1871,2590,2598,2775,4616,4929,4930
වැහි/57,62,567,799,2710,4605
විකල/834,2224
විද්‍යාල/1673,3075
විභාග/1,3,13,14,15,19,23,29,31,40,44,48,68,128,142,218,255,296,411,1534,2598,3186
වෙව්ලන/43,51,65,772
වෙසෙන/37,43,65,73,203,1436
වෙළෙන්දා/12,95,219,1387
සංඝාවාසය/4,17,190,898
සගයා/5,12,35,95,126,555,1896,2699
සතුට/1,2,4,5,7,8,13,17,18,21,24,25,28,30,87,91,148,190,208,284,595,680,741,1193,1769,1847,2045,2046,2203,2531,2763,4218,4333,4697,4725
සමක්/3920
සම්භවය/4,25,1228
සාධන/14,19,56,74,129,1185,2449
සැකසී/69,205,321,376,2183,2208,3196,3686
සැපයු/38,50,67,162,1246,2709,3193,3194,4254,4532,4826
සැමරූ/117,363
සැලැස්/146,223,485,841,1664,1866,2769,2783,3610
සැලැස්ම/2,4,5,8,9,21,25,36,220,1955,3031,4225
සීමා/159,269,279,599,1330,2130,2833,3272,4699
හයවන/1048,2187,2278
හවුල/1,2,4,6,242,445,651,937,965,1797,1815,2692,3556
හෙට්ටිගේ/1582
හේවා/104,1008,1872,3053,4668
ළමයා/3637
